Utah statutes.
31A-1-103.   Scope and applicability of title.
(1)  This title does not apply to:
(a)  a retainer contract made by an attorney-at-law:
(i)  with an individual client; and
(ii)  under which fees are based on estimates of the nature and amount of
services to be provided to the specific client;
(b)  a contract similar to a contract described in Subsection (1)(a) made with
a group of clients involved in the same or closely related legal matters;
(c)  an arrangement for providing benefits that do not exceed a limited amount
of consultations, advice on simple legal matters, either alone or in
combination with referral services, or the promise of fee discounts for
handling other legal matters;
(d)  limited legal assistance on an informal basis involving neither an
express contractual obligation nor reasonable expectations, in the context of
an employment, membership, educational, or similar relationship;
(e)  legal assistance by employee organizations to their members in matters
relating to employment; or
(f)  death, accident, health, or disability benefits provided to a person by
an organization or its affiliate if:
(i)  the organization is tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code and has had its principal place of business in Utah for at least
five years;
(ii)  the person is not an employee of the organization; and
(iii) (A)  substantially all the person's time in the organization is spent
providing voluntary services:
(I)  in furtherance of the organization's purposes;
(II)  for a designated period of time; and
(III)  for which no compensation, other than expenses, is paid; or
(B)  the time since the service under Subsection (1)(f)(iii)(A) was completed
is no more than 18 months.
(2) (a)  This title restricts otherwise legitimate business activity.
(b)  What this title does not prohibit is permitted unless contrary to other
provisions of Utah law.
(3)  Except as otherwise expressly provided, this title does not apply to:
(a)  those activities of an insurer where state jurisdiction is preempted by
Section 514 of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
amended;
(b)  ocean marine insurance;
(c)  death, accident, health, or disability benefits provided by an
organization if the organization:
(i)  has as its principal purpose to achieve charitable, educational, social,
or religious objectives rather than to provide death, accident, health, or
disability benefits;
(ii)  does not incur a legal obligation to pay a specified amount; and
(iii)  does not create reasonable expectations of receiving a specified amount
on the part of an insured person;
(d)  other business specified in rules adopted by the commissioner on a
finding that:
(i)  the transaction of the business in this state does not require regulation
for the protection of the interests of the residents of this state; or
(ii)  it would be impracticable to require compliance with this title;
(e)  except as provided in Subsection (4), a transaction independently
procured through negotiations under Section 31A-15-104;
(f)  self-insurance;
(g)  reinsurance;
(h)  subject to Subsection (5), employee and labor union group or blanket
insurance covering risks in this state if:
(i)  the policyholder exists primarily for purposes other than to procure
insurance;
(ii)  the policyholder:
(A)  is not a resident of this state;
(B)  is not a domestic corporation; or
(C)  does not have its principal office in this state;
(iii)  no more than 25% of the certificate holders or insureds are residents
of this state;
(iv)  on request of the commissioner, the insurer files with the department a
copy of the policy and a copy of each form or certificate; and
(v) (A)  the insurer agrees to pay premium taxes on the Utah portion of its
business, as if it were authorized to do business in this state; and
(B)  the insurer provides the commissioner with the security the commissioner
considers necessary for the payment of premium taxes under Title 59, Chapter
9, Taxation of Admitted Insurers;
(i)  to the extent provided in Subsection (6):
(i)  a manufacturer's or seller's warranty; and
(ii)  a manufacturer's or seller's service contract;
(j)  except to the extent provided in Subsection (7), a public agency
insurance mutual; or
(k)  except as provided in Chapter 6b, Guaranteed Asset Protection Waiver Act,
a guaranteed asset protection waiver.
(4)  A transaction described in Subsection (3)(e) is subject to taxation under
Section 31A-3-301.
(5) (a)  After a hearing, the commissioner may order an insurer of certain
group or blanket contracts to transfer the Utah portion of the business
otherwise exempted under Subsection (3)(h) to an authorized insurer if the
contracts have been written by an unauthorized insurer.
(b)  If the commissioner finds that the conditions required for the exemption
of a group or blanket insurer are not satisfied or that adequate protection to
residents of this state is not provided, the commissioner may require:
(i)  the insurer to be authorized to do business in this state; or
(ii)  that any of the insurer's transactions be subject to this title.
(6) (a)  As used in Subsection (3)(i) and this Subsection (6):
(i)  "manufacturer's or seller's service contract" means a service contract:
(A)  made available by:
(I)  a manufacturer of a product;
(II)  a seller of a product; or
(III)  an affiliate of a manufacturer or seller of a product;
(B)  made available:
(I)  on one or more specific products; or
(II)  on products that are components of a system; and
(C)  under which the person described in Subsection (6)(a)(i)(A) is liable for
services to be provided under the service contract including, if the
manufacturer's or seller's service contract designates, providing parts and
labor;
(ii)  "manufacturer's or seller's warranty" means the guaranty of:
(A) (I)  the manufacturer of a product;
(II)  a seller of a product; or
(III)  an affiliate of a manufacturer or seller of a product;
(B) (I)  on one or more specific products; or
(II)  on products that are components of a system; and
(C)  under which the person described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A) is liable
for services to be provided under the warranty, including, if the
manufacturer's or seller's warranty designates, providing parts and labor; and
(iii)  "service contract" is as defined in Section 31A-6a-101.
(b)  A manufacturer's or seller's warranty may be designated as:
(i)  a warranty;
(ii)  a guaranty; or
(iii)  a term similar to a term described in Subsection (6)(b)(i) or (ii).
(c)  This title does not apply to:
(i)  a manufacturer's or seller's warranty;
(ii)  a manufacturer's or seller's service contract paid for with
consideration that is in addition to the consideration paid for the product
itself; and
(iii)  a service contract that is not a manufacturer's or seller's warranty or
manufacturer's or seller's service contract if:
(A)  the service contract is paid for with consideration that is in addition
to the consideration paid for the product itself;
(B)  the service contract is for the repair or maintenance of goods;
(C)  the cost of the product is equal to an amount determined in accordance
with Subsection (6)(e); and
(D)  the product is not a motor vehicle.
(d)  This title does not apply to a manufacturer's or seller's warranty or
service contract paid for with consideration that is in addition to the
consideration paid for the product itself regardless of whether the
manufacturer's or seller's warranty or service contract is sold:
(i)  at the time of the purchase of the product; or
(ii)  at a time other than the time of the purchase of the product.
(e) (i)  For fiscal year 2001-02, the amount described in Subsection
(6)(c)(iii)(C) shall be equal to $3,700 or less.
(ii)  For each fiscal year after fiscal year 2001-02, the commissioner shall
annually determine whether the amount described in Subsection (6)(c)(iii)(C)
should be adjusted in accordance with changes in the Consumer Price Index
published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics selected by the
commissioner by rule, between:
(A)  the Consumer Price Index for the February immediately preceding the
adjustment; and
(B)  the Consumer Price Index for February 2001.
(iii)  If under Subsection (6)(e)(ii) the commissioner determines that an
adjustment should be made, the commissioner shall make the adjustment by rule.
(7) (a)  For purposes of this Subsection (7), "public agency insurance mutual"
means an entity formed by two or more political subdivisions or public
agencies of the state:
(i)  under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act; and
(ii)  for the purpose of providing for the political subdivisions or public
agencies:
(A)  subject to Subsection (7)(b), insurance coverage; or
(B)  risk management.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(a)(ii)(A), a public agency insurance
mutual may not provide health insurance unless the public agency insurance
mutual provides the health insurance using:
(i)  a third party administrator licensed under Chapter 25, Third Party
Administrators;
(ii)  an admitted insurer; or
(iii)  a program authorized by Title 49, Chapter 20, Public Employees' Benefit
and Insurance Program Act.
(c)  Except for this Subsection (7), a public agency insurance mutual is
exempt from this title.
(d)  A public agency insurance mutual is considered to be a governmental
entity and political subdivision of the state with all of the rights,
privileges, and immunities of a governmental entity or political subdivision
of the state including all the rights and benefits of Title 63G, Chapter 7,
Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
